Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1983
Authorized activities of title insurers.

Subject to the exceptions and restrictions contained in the Title Insurers Act, a title insurer shall have the power to:

(1) Transact only title insurance business; and

(2) Reinsure title insurance policies.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 6.